Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-1206
Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice; pilot program; federal funding.

The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice shall create a pilot program to seek federal funding for collaborative efforts in emergency response by law enforcement agencies and mental health professionals.

Laws 2025, LB150, § 6.